Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2 General Provisions
63-11-213. Privileged communications.

For the purpose of this chapter, the confidential relations and communications between licensed psychologist or psychological examiner or senior psychological examiner or certified psychological assistant and client are placed upon the same basis as those provided by law between attorney and client; and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require any such privileged communication to be disclosed.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 17 (Williams, § 7082.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1117; Acts 2001, ch. 123, § 22.

Cross-References. Communications between attorney and client, § 23-3-105.

Communications between psychiatrist and patient, § 24-1-207.

Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 501; § 501.7.

Law Reviews.

Evidence — Privileged Communications in Divorce Actions: Psychiatrist-Patient and Presence of Third Parties, 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 110.

Hospital Records as Evidence: New Rules and Old Statutes (Donald F. Paine), 26 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 33 (1990).

Should Tennessee Bury the Dead Man Statute As Arkansas Has? (W. Dent Gitchel), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 195 (1989).

Toward a Unified Approach to Privileges and Relevancy (Thomas F. Guernsey), 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

When a Child's Best Interests Are At Issue: Privacy of Mental Health Records In Divorce and Custody Proceedings, 49 Tenn. B.J. 21 (2013).

Attorney General Opinions. Privileged communications to psychologists/therapists and their agents, OAG 92-74, 1992 Tenn. AG Lexis 72 (12/29/92).

Obtaining a parent’s mental-health information in child-custody cases. OAG 14-55, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 57 (5/14/14)

63-11-214. Code of ethics.

The board of examiners shall adopt a code of ethics to govern appropriate practices or behavior as referred to in §§ 63-11-207, 63-11-208 and 63-11-215 and shall file such code with the secretary of state within thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of such code.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 18 (Williams, § 7082.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1118.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 27.76.

63-11-215. Denial, restriction, suspension or revocation of license or certificate — Disciplinary action.

The board has the power to:

Deny an application for a license or certificate to any applicant;

Permanently or temporarily withhold issuance of a license or certificate;

Suspend, limit or restrict a previously issued license or certificate for such time and in such manner as the board may determine;

Reprimand or take such action in relation to disciplining an applicant or licensee or certified person as the board in its discretion may deem proper; or

Permanently revoke a license or certificate.

The grounds upon which the board shall exercise the powers enumerated in subsection (a) include, but are not limited to:

Unprofessional, dishonorable or unethical conduct;

Violation or attempted violation, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter or any lawful order of the board issued pursuant thereto, or any criminal statute of the state;

Making false statements or representations, being guilty of fraud or deceit in obtaining admission to practice or being guilty of fraud or deceit in the course of professional practice;

Gross health care liability or a pattern of continued or repeated health care liability, ignorance, negligence or incompetence in the course of practice;

Habitual intoxication or personal misuse of any drugs or the use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics, controlled substances, controlled substance analogues or other drugs or stimulants in such manner as to adversely affect the person's ability to practice the person's profession;

Willfully betraying a professional secret;

The advertising of psychological practice in which untrue or misleading statements are made or causing the publication or circulation of fraudulent advertising relative to any disease, human ailment or condition;

Willful violation of the rules and regulations that may be promulgated by the board to regulate advertising by practitioners who are under the jurisdiction of such board;

Conviction of a felony, conviction of any offense under state or federal drug laws or conviction of any offense involving moral turpitude;

Making or signing in one's professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time one makes or signs such certificate;

Offering, undertaking or agreeing to cure or treat a disease, injury, ailment or infirmity by a secret means, method, device or instrumentality;

Giving, receiving or aiding or abetting in the giving or receiving of rebates, either directly or indirectly;

Engaging in practice under a false or assumed name or the impersonation of another practitioner of a like, similar or different name;

Engaging in practice when mentally or physically unable to safely do so;

Violation of chapter 6 of this title; and

Practice of a level of psychology inappropriate or beyond the scope of the particular license or licenses or certification held by the licensee or certified person.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 12 (Williams, § 7082.12); Acts 1955, ch. 56, § 1; 1979, ch. 201, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1119; Acts 1985, ch. 120, § 12; 2001, ch. 123, §§ 23-28; 2012, ch. 798, § 45; 2012, ch. 848, § 75; 2018, ch. 745, § 27.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-11-216. Administrative procedure.

All proceedings for disciplinary action against a licensee or certified person under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 13 (Williams, § 7082.13); Acts 1979, ch. 201, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1120; Acts 1985, ch. 120, § 13; 2001, ch. 123, § 29.

63-11-217. Review of board actions.

Any action of or ruling or order made or entered by the board declining to issue a certificate, declining to recommend licensure or certification or suspending or revoking a certificate or license shall be subject to review by the courts of this state in the same manner and subject to the same powers and conditions as now provided by law in regard to rulings, orders and findings of other quasi-judicial bodies in this state, where not otherwise specifically provided.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 14 (Williams, § 7082.14); Acts 1979, ch. 201, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1121; Acts 2001, ch. 123, § 30.

Cross-References. Review of quasi-judicial bodies generally, title 27, ch. 9.

63-11-218. Annual registration fee — Revocation and renewal of licenses and certification — Registration by retirees.

Each licensed psychologist or psychological examiner or senior psychological examiner or certified psychological assistant shall pay an annual registration fee as set annually by the board, payable in advance, for the ensuing year. As a condition of renewal, the board may require that the licensee or certified person establish that the licensee or certified person has satisfied any continuing education requirements established by board rule.

When any licensee or certified person shall fail to pay the annual fee after the renewal fee becomes due and satisfy such continuing education requirements for renewal as may be established by the board, as provided in this section, the license or certificate of such person shall be automatically revoked by the board without further notice or hearing, unless renewal is completed and all fees paid prior to the expiration of sixty (60) days from the date such renewal fees become due.

Any person whose license or certificate is automatically revoked as provided in this section may make application in writing to the board for the reinstatement of such license or certificate; and upon good cause being shown, the board, in its discretion, may reinstate such license or certificate upon payment of all past due annual registration fees, proof that any continuing education renewal requirement established by the board has been satisfied and upon further payment of a sum to be set by the board.

Any person licensed or certified to practice by this chapter who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person shall file with this board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit shall state the date on which such person retired from such practice and such other facts as shall tend to verify such retirement as the board shall deem necessary. If such person thereafter reengages in such practice in this state, such person shall apply for registration with the board as provided by this chapter and shall meet other requirements as may be set by the board.

Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license or certification renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license or certification workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses or certificates issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and shall expire on the last day of the last month of the license or certification period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter, when the board shall determine that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or certificates or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license or certificate under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license or certification expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (d).

Acts 1976, ch. 517, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-1123; Acts 1984, ch. 937, §§ 46-48; 1986, ch. 675, §§ 8, 20; T.C.A., § 63-11-219; Acts 1987, ch. 316, § 2; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 37, 38; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 30, 31; 2001, ch. 123, §§ 31-35.

Cross-References. License and registration fees, § 63-1-112.

Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-11-219. [Reserved.]

As used in this section, “peer review committee” or “committee” means any committee, board, commission or other entity constituted by any statewide psychological association or local psychological association for the purpose of receiving and evaluating professional acts of other practitioners of psychology as defined in this chapter.

Any practitioner of psychology who serves on any peer review committee or on any other committee is immune from liability with respect to any action taken in good faith and without malice as a member of such committee, board, commission or other entity.

Practitioners of psychology, any individuals appointed to a committee as defined in subsection (a) and members of the boards of directors of facilities as defined in §§ 33-5-402 and 68-11-201 are immune from liability to any client, patient, individual or organization for furnishing information, data, reports or records to any such committee or for damages resulting from any decision, opinions, actions and proceedings rendered, entered or acted upon by such committee, undertaken or performed within the scope or functions of the duties of such committee, if made or taken in good faith and without malice and on the basis of facts reasonably known or reasonably believed to exist.

All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda or other data furnished to a peer review committee, associational board or governing board, and any findings, conclusions or recommendations resulting from the proceedings of such committees, associational boards and governing boards are privileged.

The records and proceedings are confidential and shall be used only in the exercise of the proper functions of the committees, associational boards or governing boards and shall not become public records nor be available for court subpoena or discovery proceedings.

Nothing contained in this subsection (d) applies to records, documents or information otherwise available from original sources and such records, documents or information are not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in any civil proceedings solely due to presentation to the committee.

Acts 1990, ch. 653, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 8M.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

63-11-221. Health service providers in internship program — Waiver of supervised postdoctoral experience.

Any person currently enrolled in an internship program satisfying the requirements of § 63-11-208(d)(1) and who completes the internship and all other degree requirements by December 31, 1992, shall be designated as a health service provider without completing the one-year full-time supervised postdoctoral experience as provided in § 63-11-208(d)(1) if an application for such designation is submitted by July 1, 1993.

Acts 1992, ch. 991, § 3.

63-11-222. Psychologists licensed as of June 30, 1992 — Health service provider designation.

Any psychologist licensed under this chapter as a school, clinical or counseling psychologist as of June 30, 1992, shall be designated by the board as a health service provider; provided, that such person submits an application to the board for such designation by July 1, 1993. Any psychologist licensed under this chapter other than as a school, clinical or counseling psychologist as of June 30, 1992, who documents to the satisfaction of the board that such person has been engaged in providing health services as a psychologist for a minimum of two (2) years shall be designated by the board as a health service provider; provided, that application for such designation is submitted to the board by July 1, 1993.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (a) or any other law to the contrary, the board shall designate as a health service provider any person who meets the following criteria:

Holds a Ph.D. in education from an accredited college or university;

Possesses at least three thousand nine hundred (3,900) hours of clinical experience supervised by licensed clinical and counseling psychologists at an accredited school of medicine;

Is a national board certified counselor;

Has been practicing in Tennessee as a professional counselor for a period of six (6) or more years;

Was licensed by the board as a psychologist on July 15, 1992, with a declared specialty area other than school, clinical or counseling psychology; and

Has submitted to the board an application for such designation by December 31, 1994.

Acts 1992, ch. 991, § 4; 1995, ch. 104, § 1.

63-11-223. Titles referring to licensed psychologist and health care provider.

For purposes of federal legislation and regulations referencing qualifications with respect to the provision of psychological services and other titles in this code, unless the context otherwise requires, “licensed clinical psychologist,” “licensed counseling psychologist” or “licensed school psychologist” in any variation refers to a psychologist licensed under this chapter and designated as a health service provider.

Acts 1992, ch. 991, § 10.

63-11-224. Third-party reimbursement.

“Community mental health centers,” as defined in § 33-1-101, institutes or governmental agencies, doctoral clinical psychology students in university-operated training clinics and those qualifying psychologists employing psychologists with temporary or provisional licenses shall be eligible to receive third-party reimbursement from any managed care plan or third-party payor for usual and customary professional services rendered by the employed psychologist with a provisional or temporary license.

Acts 1999, ch. 505, § 4; 2000, ch. 947, § 8F; 2009, ch. 69, § 1.

63-11-225. Special volunteer license for practice in free health clinic — Exemption from fees — Renewal.

A psychologist licensed pursuant to this chapter under a special volunteer license who is a medical practitioner, as defined by § 63-1-201, engaged in practice at a free health clinic shall not be subject to license fees under this chapter. The board of examiners in psychology may issue a special volunteer license, as such license is defined in § 63-1-201, to qualified applicants without fee or charge. Such license shall be for a period of two (2) years and may be renewed on a biennial basis.

Acts 2004, ch. 579, § 7.

63-11-226. Notice to patients of departure.

Psychologists, senior psychological examiners and psychological examiners are not required to notify patients that were treated by them at community mental health centers, as defined in § 33-1-101, of their departure from such community mental health centers. Patient records shall remain with the community mental health centers. The transfer of patients' records shall be in compliance with standards set by state and federal law.

Acts 2005, ch. 53, § 1.